Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.100

Dealer licensing and registration required.

Every dealer shall be licensed as provided in RCW 9.41.110 and shall register with the department of revenue as provided in chapters 82.04 and 82.32 RCW.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 415; 1935 c 172 s 10; RRS s 2516-10.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.

Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 7 ss 401-410, 413-416, 418-437, and 439-460: See note following RCW 9.41.010.